dictionaries/sk_SK/src/Slovak.aff
SFX Z Y 165     # vzor žena množné číslo
SFX Z   ina         ín         ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ína is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           y          a is:nominative is:plural
SFX Z   a           í          [euo]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          k          [^áéíóúýô].oka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ta          t          orta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   va          v          [^áéíóúýô].ova is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   la          l          iela is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúŕýô].a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          áuka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [i][aeu][^dnl]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          yena is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ie.[^kd]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúýô][^hzž][^kbe]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ŕ...[^kl]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          i[eua].[ayou][bdv]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúýŕô].[eiayuol].a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ia[tč]ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ázda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúýô][^áéíóúýô]čina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [^šo].ola is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúýô][hknsšvz][artd][auio][dtnb]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ie[hnprsv][čňrt][aie][dnlv]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          áľanda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [úlač][seámu][fptv]ora is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          tvora is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúý][^áéíóúýp][^iľň]ava is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          iemota is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [ýá]straha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ávlaha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [^e][^g]enda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ra          er         [úý]hra is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   va          ev         [úý][zž]va is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   aba         áb         laba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ala         ál         iala is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   aha         áh         [^áéíóúýv][^ir]aha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ata         át         [^áéíóúý].[^iš]ata is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ava         áv         [^áéíóúý][^áéíóúýŕp][^iľň]ava is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ada         ád         [^i][aeiouy].ada is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ada         ád         [iom][bhz]rada is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ada         ád         a[mh][bň]ada is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ica         íc         ivica is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ob         ia.ba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ob         [áéíóúýô].ba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ata         iat        šata is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   oba         ôb         [^rzeéíáýúôó][^j]oba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ota         ôt         [^iéíáýúôóŕĺ][^éíáýúôó][^d]ota is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   oda         ôd         [^éíáýúôóŕĺ].oda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   oha         ôh         [^áéíóúý]loha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ola         ôl         škola is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ola         ôl         odola is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ora         ôr         [hkm]ora is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ora         ôr         [od]pora is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         [^f]i[ea].ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         [áéíóúýôŕ][^u]ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         [aieo]jka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         [áéíóúýôŕ]stka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         i[eau]stka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         ientka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        iantka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         ádzka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   äta         iat        äta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   aba         iab        žaba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^t][rns]ba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^i].tba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^ú][vzž]ba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   eda         ied        [^i]eda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   eba         ieb        [^i]eba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ra          ier        [hd]ra is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   va          iev        [kštzž]va is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   va          iev        arva is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ľva         liev       ľva is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ľba         lieb       [aeo]ľba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ilba        ílb        ilba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   dba         dieb       [auo]dba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ďka         diek       [^i][^éíóôúý]ďka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ňka         niek       [^i][^éíóôúý]ňka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ťka         tiek       [^i][^éíóôúý]ťka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   arta        árt        arta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][lr][fdcčš]ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][aeiuy][bcčdfghklmoprsštvzž]ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][aeuiy][sn]tka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        o[bcčdfghklmnoprsštvzž]ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [lr]nka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][eiuy]nka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^ib]anka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ľka         liek       [^i][aeouy]ľka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   eta         iet        [^p][^o][^iu]eta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   alva        álv        alva is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   rva         ŕv         [bmt]rva is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   rba         ŕb         trba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   aba         áb         baba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   iba         íb         iba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   uda         úd         uda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   iha         íh         iha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ika         ík         [^éíáýúôó].ika is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ila         íl         [^a]ila is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ita         ít         [^i][aeiouy].ita is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ina         ín         [^i][äaeiouy].ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ina         ín         [^i][aoley][bhjlnrtv]čina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ina         ín         [^a][bcčdhrkjrndďtvzž][clmnpšrvz]ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   elta        ielt       [^i]elta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ela         iel        [^dilnrtu]ela is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   esta        iest       [^d][^i]esta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   enda        iend       egenda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ena         ien        [^mty]ena is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ena         ien        [^éíáýúôó]mena is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ma          iem        [^i]erma is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   anda        ánd        [^á].anda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   arda        árd        arda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   amba        ámb        amba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   imba        ímb        imba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   omba        ômb        [^l]omba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   umba        úmb        umba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   unda        únd        unda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   rnda        ŕnd        rnda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   avda        ávd        avda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ažda        ážd        ažda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   abzda       ábzd       abzda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   azda        ázd        azda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   auna        áun        auna is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   uka         úk         [^éíáýúôó][^á]uka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   una         ún         [dklr]una is:genitive is:plural
